Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1892.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2(4)(xxi) of the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law, is amended and the clause is amended by adding a subclause to read:Section 2. Definitions.--As used in this act.* * *(4) "Unfair methods of competition" and "unfair or deceptive acts or practices" mean any one or more of the following:* * *(xxi) Increasing the posted price per gallon for a grade of 12345678910111213141516171819 gasoline sold at retail at a retail location during the period between deliveries of that grade to that location, except that a retail gasoline dealer may decrease the posted price at any time. A change in posted price under this subclause shall be determined separately for each grade of gasoline and each payment method at each retail location. Nothing in this subclause shall be construed to prohibit a change in posted price that solely reflects a change in a Federal, State or local tax or fee imposed on gasoline or corrects a bona fide clerical or mathematical error documented in the dealer's records. As used in this subclause:(A) " Delivery " means transfer of gasoline by a supplier, wholesaler or distributor into storage tanks at the retail location, as evidenced by a bill of lading, delivery ticket or similar record.(B) " Gasoline " means motor gasoline suitable for use in spark-ignition engines.(C) " Grade " means a grade of gasoline distinguishable by octane rating or formulation offered for sale at the retail location.(D) " Posted price " means the per-gallon price displayed or otherwise made available to consumers at the point of sale for a specified grade and payment method.(E) " Retail gasoline dealer " means a person that sells gasoline to consumers for use in motor vehicles at a fixed retail location.[(xxi)] (xxii) Engaging in any other fraudulent or deceptive conduct which creates a likelihood of confusion or of misunderstanding.* * *20250HB1892PN2357 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2. Section 3(a) of the act is amended to read:Section 3. Unlawful Acts or Practices; Exclusions.--(a) Unfair methods of competition and unfair or deceptive acts or practices in the conduct of any trade or commerce as defined by subclauses (i) through [(xxi)] (xxii) of clause (4) of section 2 of this act and regulations promulgated under section 3.1 of this act are hereby declared unlawful. The provisions of this act shall not apply to any owner, agent or employe of any radio or television station, or to any owner, publisher, printer, agent or employe of an Internet service provider or a newspaper or other publication, periodical or circular, who, in good faith and without knowledge of the falsity or deceptive character thereof, publishes, causes to be published or takes part in the publication of such advertisement.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1892PN2357 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516